Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201381-12,143
Act; termination.

The
Small Business Innovation Act terminates on December 31, 2014.

Laws 2011, LB345, § 8;

Laws 2013, LB628, § 3.
September 6, 2013December 31, 2014